it: Abbigliamento e accessori > Accessori per scarpe: Fodere per stivali; Ghette; Coperture scarpe; Solette per la tenuta delle scarpe; Plantari per scarpe; Stringhe per scarpe; Speroni
ru: Одежда, обувь и аксессуары > Аксессуары для обуви: Чулки-вкладыши; Гамаши; Бахилы; Противоскользящие накладки; Стельки и вставки; Шнурки; Шпоры
th: เสื้อผ้าและเครื่องประดับ > อุปกรณ์รองเท้า: ที่บุรองเท้าบูท; ผ้าคลุมรองเท้า; ที่คลุมรองเท้า; ที่จับรองเท้า; แผ่นเสริมรองเท้า; เชือกผูกรองเท้า; สเปอร์
lt-LT: Apranga ir aksesuarai > Batų aksesuarai: Batų įdėklai; Getrai; Antbačiai; Grandinės batams; Batų įdėklai; Batraiščiai; Pentinai
pt-BR: Vestuário e acessórios > Acessórios para sapatos: Revestimentos para botas; Polainas de montaria; Capas para calçados; Solas exteriores; Palmilhas ortopédicas; Cadarços; Esporas
nb: Klær og tilbehør > Skotilbehør: Innersåler; Gamasjer; Skotrekk; Brodder; Skoinnlegg; Skolisser; Sporer
vi: Quần áo & Phụ kiện > Phụ kiện giày: Lót ủng; Xà cạp; Bao giày; Miếng dán đế giày chống trượt; Miếng lót giày; Dây giày; Cựa sắt
zh-CN: 服饰与配饰 > 鞋类配饰: 靴子衬里; 鞋套/脚盖; 鞋套; 防滑鞋夹; 鞋垫; 鞋带; 马刺
sl-SI: Oblačila in dodatki > Dodatki za obutev: Podloge za škornje; Gamaše; Zaščitne prevleke za čevlje; Protizdrsni podplati; Vložki za čevlje; Vezalke; Ostroge
sv: Kläder och accessoarer > Skotillbehör: Skoinlägg; Damasker; Skoöverdrag; Skogrepp; Skosulor; Skosnören; Sporrar
nl: Kleding en accessoires > Accessoires voor schoenen: Schoenbeschermers; Slobkousen; Schoenhoezen; Schoengrepen; Schoeninzetstukken; Schoenveters; Sporen
fi: Vaatteet ja asusteet > Kenkätarvikkeet: Saapassuojat; Nilkkaimet; Kengänsuojukset; Kengänpohjat; Muotoilevat pohjalliset; Kengännauhat; Kannukset
de: Bekleidung & Accessoires > Schuh-Accessoires: Stiefelsocken; Gamaschen; Überschuhe; Schuhspikes; Schuheinlagen; Schnürsenkel; Sporen
ja: ファッション・アクセサリー > 靴用品: ブーツライナー; ゲートル; シューズカバー; 靴アウトソール; 靴インサート; 靴ひも; 拍車
pt-PT: Acessórios e vestuário > Acessórios para calçado: Forros para botas; Polainas; Coberturas para calçado; Acessórios de aderência para calçado; Acessórios para inserir em calçado; Atacadores; Esporas
en: Apparel & Accessories > Shoe Accessories: Boot Liners; Gaiters; Shoe Covers; Shoe Grips; Shoe Inserts; Shoelaces; Spurs
ko: 의류/액세서리 > 신발 액세서리: 부츠 안감; 각반; 신발 커버; 논슬립 신발 패드; 신발 깔창; 신발끈; 박차
hr-HR: Odjeća i modni dodaci > Dodaci za obuću: Ulošci za čizme; Gamaše; Navlake za obuću; Neklizajući dodatak za potplat; Umetci za obuću; Vezice; Mamuze
es: Ropa y accesorios > Accesorios para zapatos: Forros para botas; Polainas; Fundas para zapatos; Almohadillas antideslizantes para zapatos; Alzas para zapatos; Cordones de zapatos; Espuelas
el: Ένδυση και αξεσουάρ > Αξεσουάρ παπουτσιών: Επενδύσεις για μπότες; Γκέτες; Καλύμματα παπουτσιών; Αντιολισθητικά παπούτσια; Εσωτερικά πέλματα παπουτσιών; Κορδόνια; Σπιρούνια
ro-RO: Îmbrăcăminte și accesorii > Accesorii pentru încălțăminte: Căptușeli pentru încălțăminte; Ghetre; Huse de protecție pentru încălțăminte; Crampoane pentru încălțăminte; Inserții pentru pantofi; Șireturi; Pinteni
cs: Oblečení a doplňky > Doplňky k obuvi: Vnitřní botičky; Návleky; Návleky na boty; Nesmeky; Vložky do bot; Tkaničky do bot; Ostruhy
fr: Vêtements et accessoires > Accessoires pour chaussures: Chaussettes pour bottes; Guêtres; Sur-chaussures; Crampons de chaussures; Semelles de chaussures; Lacets; Éperons
sk-SK: Oblečenie a doplnky > Doplnky obuvi: Vložky do topánok; Návleky; Návleky na topánky; Protišmykové podrážky; Vložky do topánok; Šnúrky do topánok; Ostrohy
pl: Ubrania i akcesoria > Akcesoria do butów: Ocieplacze do butów; Sztylpy; Ochraniacze na buty; Nakładki na buty; Wkładki do obuwia; Sznurowadła; Ostrogi
bg-BG: Облекло и аксесоари > Аксесоари за обувки: Подплати за ботуши; Гети; Калъфи за обувки; Противоплъзгащи подметки; Стелки за обувки; Връзки за обувки; Шпори
zh-TW: 服飾與配件 > 鞋類配件: 靴子內襯; 綁腿/鞋罩; 鞋罩; 鞋子防滑墊; 加裝鞋墊; 鞋帶; 馬刺
da: Tøj og tilbehør > Tilbehør til sko: Støvlefor; Gamacher; Skoovertræk; Skogreb; Skoindlæg; Snørebånd; Sporer
tr: Kıyafet ve Aksesuarlar > Ayakkabı Aksesuarları: Ayakkabı Astarları; Getrler; Galoşlar; Ayakkabı Kaymazları; Ayakkabı İçleri; Ayakkabı Bağcıkları; Mahmuzlar
hu: Ruházat és kiegészítők > Cipőkiegészítők: Csizmatartók; Lábszárvédők; Cipőhuzatok; Cipőfogantyúk; Cipőbetétek; Cipőfűzők; Sarkantyúk